Missouri, session 2026, HB2238.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 167, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 167.204, to read as follows:
167.204. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Hayes Act".
2. As used in this section, the term "school" shall mean any public school
district, public school, public charter school, or private, religious, or parochial school
that participates in the National School Lunch Program administered by the United
States Department of Agriculture (USDA), or such program's successor, but that does
not participate in the Community Eligibility Provision administered by the USDA, or
such provision's successor.
3. A school shall provide a free lunch to each student who has been approved to
receive a reduced price lunch under the National School Lunch Program or its successor
program. Subject to appropriation, the state board of education shall reimburse schools
the difference between the total cost of each lunch provided under this subsection and
the federal reimbursement rate for each lunch provided under this subsection.
4. A school shall determine which students may be eligible for free or reduced
price lunch through the National School Lunch Program or its successor program and
shall provide information and assistance to parents and guardians of such students for
purposes of filling out an application.
5. A school shall not publicly identify or otherwise stigmatize a student who is or
may be eligible for free or reduced price lunch. A student's application for the National
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2238 2
School Lunch Program or its successor program shall be used only for federal
reimbursement and for state aid calculations under chapter 163.
6. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "School Meals Fund",
which shall consist of moneys appropriated by the general assembly for the purposes of
implementing the provisions of this section. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the
fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve
disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and moneys in the fund shall be used
solely by the state board of education for the purposes of reimbursing schools as
provided in subsection 3 of this section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
7. The state board of education shall promulgate rules and regulations for the
implementation of this section. Such rules shall include the process by which schools
may apply for reimbursement as provided in subsection 3 of this section. Any rule or
portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is
subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after the effective date of this
section shall be invalid and void.
✔